Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 25.3 School Speech and Language Pathologists
[See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]

16-25.3-1.
Statement of purpose.

To ensure proper servicing of communicatively impaired students, the general assembly recognizes that the quality and effectiveness of speech language services is affected by several factors, including but not limited to caseloads. The addition of a speech language pathologist (SLP) to an affected student’s multidisciplinary team will further assist in ensuring proper referral.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 84, § 1.

16-25.3-2.
Employment of speech language pathologists.

Each school district is encouraged by the general assembly to employ one full time certified speech language pathologist for every forty (40) students who receive speech language services within the age range of three (3) to twenty-one (21). In cases where the number of students receiving speech language services is above forty (40), the school district is encouraged to employ a speech language pathologist on a part time pro-rata basis.

When a speech and language evaluation or the provision of speech language services are being considered or are part of the student’s program the speech language pathologist shall be a member of the multidisciplinary team.

In the event an individual seeks emergency certification from the department of elementary and secondary education in the area of speech language pathology, the individual must meet the following minimum requirements before the granting of emergency certification by the department of elementary and secondary education:

Hold a bachelor’s degree in communicative disorders from an accredited college or university;

Have successfully completed no less than eighteen (18) hours of graduate credit in the area of speech language pathology.

Individuals under emergency certification to conduct the business of a speech language pathologist shall be under the direct supervision of a certified speech language pathologist. At no time shall a certified speech language pathologist supervise more than one emergency certified speech language pathologist.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 84, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 203, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 246, art. 19, § 6; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 21, §§ 3, 4; P.L. 2013, ch. 501, § 42.

16-25.3-3.
Regulations.

As part of the triennial process for review of the regulations of the board of regents for elementary and secondary education governing the special education of students with disabilities, the department of elementary and secondary education shall include a review of the regulation relating to speech or language impairment, which review shall include consideration of the federal definition of speech or language impairment as well as consideration of the definitions of communication disorders and variations from the American Speech-Language-Hearing Association, as appropriate, in order to establish educationally significant standards that will assist in appropriate referral and service delivery to students.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 84, § 1.

16-25.3-4.
Continuing education units.

The department of elementary and secondary education and the board of regents for elementary and secondary education shall accept American Speech-Language-Hearing Association (ASHA) accredited continuing education units (CEU’s) completed by a speech-language pathologist (SLP) to fulfill continuing education requirements, in combination with or in lieu of college course credits. American Speech-Language-Hearing Association continuing education units will be reported in transcript from the ASHA Registry of Continuing Education to the office of teacher certification within the department of elementary and secondary education.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 304, § 1.